California statutes. Public Contract Code
(a) All public works constructed pursuant to this chapter shall comply with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(b) A business entity shall not be evaluated for selection or eligible for selection by the city unless the business entity provides an enforceable commitment to the city that the business entity and its subcontractors at every tier shall use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all construction work
 on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply if one or more of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the business entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement. 

(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the city before January 1, 2025, which binds all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) The business entity has entered into a project labor agreement that shall bind the entity and all of its subcontractors at every tier performing construction work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22195.

The business entity shall provide payment bonds for the project issued by a California-admitted surety in the form, at the times, and in the amount required by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22196.

(a) The relevant contracts between the city and the business entity for the project shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(b) The relevant contracts between the city and the business entity shall be subject to subdivision (b) of Section 2782 of the Civil Code.

(c) Any contract between the business entity and a contractor or subcontractor relating to the project shall
 be subject to Section 2782.05 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22197.

(a) The negotiation process shall expressly prohibit practices that may result in unlawful activity, including, but not limited to, rebates, kickbacks, or other unlawful consideration.

(b) The negotiation process shall expressly prohibit city employees from participating in the selection process when those employees have a relationship with a person or business entity seeking a contract under this chapter that would subject those employees to Section 87100 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22198.

All documents related to the project shall be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except those exempted from disclosure under the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22199.

(a) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(b) Except as expressly provided herein, this chapter does not affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.9. Construction Manager/General Contractor Project Delivery Program [22199.5. - 22199.6.]

22199.5.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and meeting the objectives of the project.

(b) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to a Construction
 Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(c) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the contract for preconstruction services or at a later time. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(d) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or special district authorized by law to provide for the production, storage, supply, treatment, or distribution of any water from any source.

(e) “Preconstruction services” means advice during
 the design phase, including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the local agency to design a more constructible project.

(f) “Project” means a public work necessary for the construction of a recycled water facility or infrastructure designed specifically to alleviate water shortages attributable to drought, climate change, or other environmental factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 22199.6.)
-------------------------------------------

22199.6.

(a) Upon approval by its governing body, a local agency may use, in addition to other methods of project delivery otherwise allowable by law, the Construction Manager/General Contractor method of project delivery for a regional recycled water project or other water infrastructure project undertaken to alleviate water supply
 shortages attributable to drought or climate change. The local agency shall follow the procedures described in Sections 21568.5 to 21568.10, inclusive.

(b) The authorization under this section shall apply to no more than 15 capital outlay projects for each local agency.

(c) A local agency shall award a contract pursuant to this section on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) (1) The provisions of this chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date are inoperative.

(2) A contract awarded pursuant to this chapter before it becomes inoperative, but after Sections 21568.5 to 21568.10, inclusive, become inoperative pursuant to Section 21568.11, shall continue in full force and effect until completion, including any subsequently executed changes to the contract, or termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ARBITRATION OF PUBLIC WORKS CONTRACT CLAIMS [22200. - 22201.]

22200.

As used in this part:

(a) “Public works contract” means, except for a contract awarded pursuant to the State Contract Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100)), a contract awarded through competitive bids or otherwise by the state, any of its political subdivisions or public agencies for the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any kind upon real property.

(b) “Claim” means a demand for monetary compensation or damages, arising under or relating to the performance of any public works contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1408, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, the terms of any public works contract may include at the time of bidding and of award a provision for arbitration of any claim pursuant to Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240) of Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1408, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. WITHHELD CONTRACT FUNDS [22300. - 22300.]

22300.

(a) For purposes of this section, “contractor” includes, but is not limited to, a contractor performing a public works contract, as defined in Section 1101, and any person or entity that would qualify as a contractor under Section 6106.5.

(b) Provisions shall be included in any invitation for bid and in any contract documents to permit the substitution of securities for any moneys withheld by a public agency to ensure performance under a contract; however, substitution of securities provisions shall not be required in contracts in which there will be financing provided by the Farmers Home Administration of the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to the Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. Sec.
 1921 et seq.), and where federal regulations or policies, or both, do not allow the substitution of securities. At the request and expense of the contractor, securities equivalent to the amount withheld shall be deposited with the public agency, or with a state or federally chartered bank in this state as the escrow agent, who shall then pay those moneys to the contractor. Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, the securities shall be returned to the contractor.

(c) Alternatively, the contractor may request and the owner shall make payment of retentions earned directly to the escrow agent at the expense of the contractor. At the expense of the contractor, the contractor may direct the investment of the payments into securities and the contractor shall receive the interest earned on the investments upon the same terms provided for in this section for securities deposited by the contractor. Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, the
 contractor shall receive from the escrow agent all securities, interest, and payments received by the escrow agent from the owner, pursuant to the terms of this section.

(d) Securities eligible for investment under this section shall include those listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code, bank or savings and loan certificates of deposit, interest-bearing demand deposit accounts, standby letters of credit, or any other security mutually agreed to by the contractor and the public agency.

The contractor shall be the beneficial owner of any securities substituted for moneys withheld and shall receive any interest thereon.

Failure to include these provisions in bid and contract documents shall void any provisions for performance retentions in a public agency contract.

For purposes of this section, the term “public
 agency” shall include, but shall not be limited to, chartered cities.

(e) (1) Any contractor who elects to receive interest on moneys withheld in retention by a public agency shall, at the request of any subcontractor, make that option available to the subcontractor regarding any moneys withheld in retention by the contractor from the subcontractor. If the contractor elects to receive interest on any moneys withheld in retention by a public agency, then the subcontractor shall receive the identical rate of interest received by the contractor on any retention moneys withheld from the subcontractor by the contractor, less any actual pro rata costs associated with administering and calculating that interest. In the event that the interest rate is a fluctuating rate, the rate for the subcontractor shall be determined by calculating the interest rate paid during the time that retentions were withheld from the subcontractor. If
 the contractor elects to substitute securities in lieu of retention, then, by mutual consent of the contractor and subcontractor, the subcontractor may substitute securities in exchange for the release of moneys held in retention by the contractor.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only to those subcontractors performing more than five percent of the contractor’s total bid.

(3) No contractor shall require any subcontractor to waive any provision of this section.

(f) The Legislature hereby declares that the provisions of this section are of statewide concern and are necessary to encourage full participation by contractors and subcontractors in public contract procedures.

(g) The escrow agreement used hereunder shall be null, void, and unenforceable unless
 it is substantially similar to the following form:ESCROW AGREEMENT FOR
 SECURITY DEPOSITS IN LIEU OF RETENTION
This Escrow Agreement is made and entered into by and be­tween whose address is hereinafter called “Owner,”whose address is hereinafter called “Contractor” andwhose address is
 hereinafter called “Escrow Agent.”For the consideration hereinafter set forth, the Owner, Contractor, and Escrow Agent agree as follows:

(1) Pursuant to Section 22300 of the Public Contract Code of the State of California, Contractor has the option to deposit securities with Escrow Agent as a substitute for retention earnings required to be withheld by Owner pursuant to the Construction Contract entered into between the Owner and Contractor for ____ in the amount of ____ dated ____ (hereinafter referred to as the “Contract”). Alternatively, on written request of the Contractor, the Owner shall make payments of the retention earnings directly to the Escrow Agent. When the Contractor deposits the securities as a substitute for Contract earnings, the Escrow Agent shall
 notify the Owner within 10 days of the deposit. The market value of the securities at the time of the substitution shall be at least equal to the cash amount then required to be withheld as retention under the terms of the Contract between the Owner and Contractor. Securities shall be held in the name of ____, and shall designate the Contractor as the beneficial owner.

(2) The Owner shall make progress payments to the Contractor for those funds which otherwise would be withheld from progress payments pursuant to the Contract provisions, provided that the Escrow Agent holds securities in the form and amount specified above.

(3) When the Owner makes payment of retentions earned directly to the Escrow Agent, the Escrow Agent shall hold them for the benefit of the Contractor until the time that the escrow created under this contract is terminated. The Contractor may direct the
 investment of the payments into securities. All terms and conditions of this agreement and the rights and responsibilities of the parties shall be equally applicable and binding when the Owner pays the Escrow Agent directly.

(4) Contractor shall be responsible for paying all fees for the expenses incurred by Escrow Agent in administering the Escrow Account and all expenses of the Owner. These expenses and payment terms shall be determined by the Owner, Contractor, and Escrow Agent.

(5) The interest earned on the securities or the money market accounts held in escrow and all interest earned on that interest shall be for the sole account of Contractor and shall be subject to withdrawal by Contractor at any time and from time to time without notice to the Owner.

(6) Contractor shall have the right to withdraw all or any
 part of the principal in the Escrow Account only by written notice to Escrow Agent accompanied by written authorization from the Owner to the Escrow Agent that Owner consents to the withdrawal of the amount sought to be withdrawn by Contractor.

(7) The Owner shall have a right to draw upon the securities in the event of default by the Contractor. Upon seven days’ written notice to the Escrow Agent from the owner of the default, the Escrow Agent shall immediately convert the securities to cash and shall distribute the cash as instructed by the Owner.

(8) Upon receipt of written notification from the Owner certifying that the Contract is final and complete, and that the Contractor has complied with all requirements and procedures applicable to the Contract, Escrow Agent shall release to Contractor all securities and interest on deposit less escrow fees and charges of the Escrow
 Account. The escrow shall be closed immediately upon disbursement of all moneys and securities on deposit and payments of fees and charges.

(9) Escrow Agent shall rely on the written notifications from the Owner and the Contractor pursuant to Sections (5) to (8), inclusive, of this Agreement and the Owner and Contractor shall hold Escrow Agent harmless from Escrow Agent’s release and disbursement of the securities and interest as set forth above.

(10) The names of the persons who are authorized to give written notice or to receive written notice on behalf of the Owner and on behalf of Contractor in connection with the foregoing, and exemplars of their respective signatures are as follows: On behalf of Owner:On behalf of Contractor:
TitleTitleNameNameSignatureSignatureAddressAddress
On behalf of Escrow Agent:
TitleNameSignatureAddressAt the time the Escrow Account is opened, the Owner and Contractor shall deliver to the Escrow Agent a fully executed counterpart of this Agreement.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement by their proper officers on the date first set forth above. OwnerContractor
TitleTitleNameNameSignatureSignature

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 427, Sec. 21.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. THE YEAR 2000 PROBLEM VENDOR COMPLIANCE AND INFORMATION PRACTICES POLICY [22350. - 22355.]

22350.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Year 2000 Problem Vendor Compliance and Information Practices Policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22351.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Contractor” means any individual, corporation, partnership, business entity, joint venture or association, or any other organization or any combination thereof, that has entered into a contractual relationship with any public entity.

(b) “Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, business entity, joint venture, or association, or any other organization or any combination thereof.

(c) “Year 2000 Problem” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 3269 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.

It is the policy of this state to do business solely with those persons and contractors that, subsequent to entering into any contract with a public entity, recognize the importance and urgency of the Year 2000 Problem, respond to inquiries from public entities regarding Year 2000 Problem compliance for all goods or services provided to the state, and participate in the disclosure of information to public entities regarding Year 2000 Problem compliance for all goods and services provided to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.

(a) Any public entity may submit a written request for information regarding the Year 2000 Problem to any contractor who is under contract to provide, or was at any time under contract to provide, any project, materials, supplies, equipment, services, or real property, as described in Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100).

(b) Each request made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information:

(1) A direct citation of the authority to make a request pursuant to this part.

(2) Notification of the policy of the state regarding the Year 2000 Problem, as set forth in Section 22352.

(3) Notification of the responsible bidder provisions that exist under the State Contract Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22355.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to require any person or contractor to disclose any information that qualifies for protection as a trade secret, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 784, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

